de: dreifach konzentriert
es: triple concentrado
fr: triple concentré
it: triplo concentrato
nl: drievoudig geconcentreerd
pl: potrójnie skoncentrowany
pt: triplo concentrado
ru: тройной концентрат
sv: trippelkoncentrerad, trippelkoncentrerat, trippelkoncentrerade

en: concentrated extract
ca: extracte concentrat
de: konzentrierter Extrakt
es: extracto concentrado
fi: konsentroitu uute
fr: extrait concentré
hr: koncentrirani ekstrakt
it: estratto concentrato
ja: 濃縮エキス
nl: geconcentreerd extract
pl: ekstrakt skoncentrowany
sv: koncentrerad extrakt
uk: екстракт концентрований, концентрований екстракт

de: eingekochter
nl: ingekookt

en: from concentrate
bg: от концентрат
ca: a base de concentrat, a partir de concentrat
cs: koncentrát z, koncentrátu, z koncentrátu
da: fra koncentrat, fra koncentrater
de: aus Konzentrat, aus Konzentraten
es: a base de concentrado, a base de concentrada, a partir de concentrado, a partir de concentrada
fi: tiivisteestä, tiivisteestä valmistettu
fr: à base de concentré, à partir de concentré
hr: koncentrirane, koncentrirano, na koncentrat, od koncentrirana soka, od koncentriranog soka škrob, od koncentriranog soka
hu: sűrítményből, koncentrátumból, sűrítményekből, koncentrátumokból
it: da concentrato
ja: 濃縮還元
lt: iš koncentrato
nl: uit concentraat, van concentraat, op basis van concentraat
pl: z koncentratu, z zagęszczonego, z zagęszczonych, z koncentratu z
pt: a partir de concentrado, à base de concentrado
ro: din concentrat
sk: z koncentrátu
sv: från koncentrat, delvis från koncentrat
uk: з концентрату
zh: 浓缩还原

en: not from concentrate
da: ikke fra koncentrat, ikke fra koncentrater
sv: inte från koncentrat

en: dried, dry
ar: مجف
bg: изсушен, изсушено, изсушена, изсушени, сушен, сушено, сушена, сушени, сухо, суха
ca: dessecat, dessecade, dessecades, dessecats
co: secchi
cs: sušené, sušená, sušenná, sušený, suseny
da: tørret, tørrede
de: getrocknet, getrocknete, getrockneter, getrocknetes, getrockneten, getrocknetem, in getrockneter form, Trocken
es: seco, seca, secos, secas, secados, secadas, desecado, desecada, desecados, desecadas
et: kuivatatud
fi: kuivattu, kuivatut
fr: séché, séchée, séchés, séchées, sèches, sec, secs, sèche, sèches
he: מיובשים, מיובש, יבש
hr: sušena, sušene, sušeni, sušeno, suha, suhe, suhi, suho, suhog
hu: szárított
it: secco, secca, secchi, secche, essiccato, essiccati, essiccata, essiccate
ja: ドライ, 乾燥
lt: džiovinti, džiovinta
lv: žāvēti, sausais
nb: tørkede, tørr
nl: gedroogd, gedroogde
nn: tørket
pl: suszony, suszona, suszone, suszonych, suszonej, suszonego, susz z, susz, suszu
pt: seco, seca, secos, secas
ro: uscate, uscată
ru: сушеный, Сушеное, сушёная, сушёный, сухое, из сухого, из сухого молока
sk: sušené
sr: sušeno
sv: torkad, torkat, torkade
th: ตาก, ออบแห้ง
uk: сушений, сушена, сушене, сухе, сушені, сухий, суха, сухі

en: semi-dried
de: halbgetrocknet, halbgetrocknete, halbgetrockneter, halbgetrocknetes, halbgetrockneten, halbgetrocknetem, halb getrocknet
es: semiseco
fr: semi séché, semi-séchée, semi-séchés, semi-séchées, mi-séché, mi-séchée, mi-séchés, mi-séchées, semi-sec, semi-secs, semi-sèche, semi-sèches, demi-sec, demi-secs, demi-sèche, demi-sèches
nl: halfgedroogd, halfgedroogde
pl: podsuszany, podsuszana, podsuszane
pt: semi-seco, semi-seca, semi-secos, semi-secas
sv: semitorkad, semitorkat, semitorkade
zh: 半干制

en: freeze dried
da: frysetørret, frysetørrede
de: gefriergetrocknet, gefriergetrocknete, gefriergetrockneter, gefriergetrocknetes, gefriergetrockneten, gefriergetrocknetem
fi: pakkaskuivattu, pakkaskuivatut, pakastekuivattu
fr: lyophilisé, lyophilisée, lyophilisés, lyophilisées
hr: liofilizirane, liofiliziran, liofilizirana, liofilizirani, liofiliziranih, liofilizacijom, sušeno smrzavanjem
hu: fagyasztva szárított
it: liofilizzata, liofilizzate, liofilizzato, liofilizzati
nb: frysetørkede
nl: gevriesdroogde
pl: liofilizowane, liofilizowana, liofilizowany, liofilizowanej
pt: liofilizado, liofilizados, liofilizada, liofilizadas
sv: frystorkad, frystorkat, frystorkade
zh: 冻干

en: sundried, sun dried
ca: assecat al sol
da: soltørret, soltørrede
de: sonnengetrocknet, sonnengetrocknete, sonnengetrockneter, sonnengetrocknetes, sonnengetrockneten, sonnengetrocknetem, an der Sonne getrocknet, an der Sonne getrocknete, an der Sonne getrockneter, an der Sonne getrocknetes
es: secados al sol
fi: aurinkokuivattu, aurinkokuivatut
fr: séché au soleil, séchée au soleil, séchés au soleil, séchées au soleil
hu: napon szárított
it: essiccato al sole, essiccati al sole, essiccata al sole, essiccate al sole
nb: soltørkede
nl: zongedroogd, zongedroogde
pl: suszone w słońcu, suszone na słońcu
pt: seco ao sol, seca ao sol, secos ao sol, secas ao sol
sv: soltorkad, soltorkat, soltorkade
uk: в'ялений, в'ялена, в'ялене, в'ялені

en: air dried
de: luftgetrocknet, luftgetrocknete, luftgetrockneter, luftgetrocknetes, luftgetrockneten, luftgetrocknetem
hu: levegőn szárított
pt: seco ao ar, seca ao ar, secos ao ar, secas ao ar
sv: lufttorkad, lufttorkade, lufttorkat
zh: 风干

en: spray dried
de: sprühgetrocknet, sprühgetrocknete, sprühgetrockneter, sprühgetrocknetes
zh: 喷雾干燥

en: dry baked
ca: hornat sec
de: trocken gebacken
es: horneado seco
fr: cuit au four sec
hr: suhopečeni
it: cotto al forno secco
nl: droog gebakken
pl: suchy pieczony
pt: assado a seco
sv: torrbakad, torrbakat, torrbakade
zh: 干烤

en: cured
ca: curat
es: curado, curada, curados, curadas
it: curato, curata, curati, curate
pl: peklowany, peklowana, peklowane
pt: curado, curada, curados, curadas
zh: 腌制

en: firmed
da: skærefast
de: schnittfester, schnittfest
el: σκληρή
fr: affinée
nl: Geharde
sv: skivbar
zh: 硬化

en: syrup, molasses
bg: сироп
ca: xarop
da: sirup
de: sirup
es: sirope
fr: sirop
hr: sirup, u laganom sirupu
it: sciroppo, sciroppo di, sciroppo d', melassa, melassa di, melassa d'
pl: syrop
pt: Xarope
sv: sirap
uk: сироп

en: anhydrous
ar: لامائي
ca: Anhidre
da: Vandfri
es: Anhidro
eu: Anhidro
fa: انیدروز
fr: Anhydref
id: Anhidrat
it: Anidro
nl: Watervrij
pt: Anidro
vi: Khan
zh: 无水物

en: dehydrated
bg: дехидратиран, дехидратирано, дехидратирана, дехидратирани
ca: deshidratat, deshidratada
da: dehydreret, dehydrerede
de: dehydriert, dehydrierte, dehydriertes, dehydrierter, dehydrierten, dehydriertem
es: deshidratado, deshidratada, deshidratados, deshidratadas
fr: déshydraté, déshydratée, déshydratés, déshydratées
hr: dehidrirani, osušeno
hu: dehidratált, liofilizált
it: disidratato, disidratata, disidratati, disidratate
nb: dehydrerte, dehydrert
nl: gedehydrateerde
pl: odwodniony, odwodnione, odwodniona
pt: desidratado, desidratada, desidratados, desidratadas
ro: deshidratată, deshidratate
sv: dehydrerat, dehydrerad, dehydrerade
uk: дегідратований, зневоднений, зневоднена, зневоднене, зневоднені, дегідратована, дегідратоване, дегідратовані, дегідрований, дегідрована, дегідроване, дегідровані

en: partially dehydrated
bg: частично дехидратиран, частично дехидратирано, частично дехидратирана, частично дехидратирани
ca: parcialment deshidratat, parcialment deshidratada
da: delvist dehydreret, delvist dehydrerede
es: parcialmente deshidratado, parcialmente deshidratada, parcialmente deshidratados, parcialmente deshidratadas
fr: semi-déshydraté, semi-déshydratée, semi-déshydratés, semi-déshydratées, partiellement déshydraté, partiellement déshydratée, partiellement déshydratés, partiellement déshydratées
hr: delomično dehidrirana, delomično dehidrirani
hu: részben dehidratált
it: parzialmente disidratato, parzialmente disidratata, parzialmente disidratati, parzialmente disidratate
nb: delvis dehydrerte, delvis dehydrert
pl: częściowo odwodnione, częściowo odwodniony, częściowo odwodniona
pt: parcialmente desidratado, parcialmente desidratada, parcialmente desidratados, parcialmente desidratadas
sv: delvis dehydrerat, delvis dehydrerad, delvis dehydrerade
uk: частково дегідратований, частково дегідратована, частково дегідратоване, частково дегідратовані, частково зневоднений, частково зневоднена, частково зневоднене, частково зневоднені, частково дегідрована, частково дегідрований, частково дегідроване, частково дегідровані

en: rehydrated
bg: рехидратиран, рехидратирано, рехидратирана, рехидратирани
ca: rehidratat, rehidratada
da: rehydreret, rehydrerede
de: rehydriert, rehydrierte, rehydrierter, rehydriertes, rehydrierten, rehydriertem
es: rehidritado, rehidritada, rehidritados, rehidritadas, rehidratada
fi: rehydratoitu
fr: réhydraté, réhydratée, réhydratés, réhydratées
hr: rehidrirana, rehidrirani
hu: rehidratált
it: reidratato, reidratata, reidratati, reidratate
nb: rehydrerte, rehydrert
nl: gerehydrateerde
pl: uwodnione, uwodniony, uwodniona
pt: reidratado, reidratada, reidratados, reidratadas
sv: rehydrerat, rehydrerad, rehydrerade
uk: регідратований, регідратована, регідратоване, регідратовані, регідрований, регідрована, регідроване, регідровані

en: partially rehydrated
bg: частично рехидратиран, частично рехидратирано, частично рехидратирана, частично рехидратирани
ca: parcialment rehidratat, parcialment rehidratada
da: delvist rehydreret, delvist rehydrerede
es: parcialmente rehidratado, parcialmente rehidratada, parcialmente rehidratados, parcialmente rehidratadas
fr: semi-réhydraté, semi-réhydratée, semi-réhydratés, semi-réhydratées, partiellement réhydraté, partiellement réhydratée, partiellement réhydratés, partiellement réhydratées
hr: delomično rehidrirano, delomično rehidrirana, delomično rehidrirani
hu: részben rehidratált
it: parzialmente reidratato, parzialmente reidratata, parzialmente reidratati, parzialmente reidratate
nb: delvis rehydrert, delvis rehydrerte
pl: częściowo uwodnione, częściowo uwodniony, częściowo uwodniona
pt: parcialmente reidratado, parcialmente reidratada, parcialmente reidratados, parcialmente reidratadas
sv: delvis rehydrerat, delvis rehydrerad, delvis rehydrerade
uk: частково регідратований, частково регідратована, частково регідратоване, частково регідратовані, частково регідрована, частково регідрований, частково регідроване, частково регідровані